Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 15 Limited Guardianship and Guardianship of Adults

33-15-1.
Legislative intent.

The legislature finds that adjudicating a person totally incapacitated and in need of a guardian deprives that person of all his or her civil and legal rights and that this deprivation may be unnecessary. The legislature further finds that it is desirable to make available, the least restrictive form of guardianship to assist persons who are only partially incapable of caring for their needs. Recognizing that every individual has unique needs and differing abilities, the legislature declares that it is the purpose of this act to promote the public welfare by establishing a system that permits incapacitated persons to participate as fully as possible in all decisions affecting them; that assists such persons in meeting the essential requirements for their physical health and safety, in protecting their rights, in managing their financial resources, and developing or regaining their abilities to the maximum extent possible; and that accomplishes these objectives through providing, in each case, the form of assistance that least interferes with the legal capacity of a person to act in his or her own behalf. This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish this purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4.

33-15-1.1.
Repealed.

33-15-2.
Petition for appointment of a limited guardian or guardian.

Any person may file with the probate court clerk, in the city or town where the proposed ward resides or where an out of state proposed ward has property, a verified petition for the appointment of a guardian. The petition shall state the following information known to the petitioner:

The name, age, and post office address of the proposed ward;

That, based on a decision making assessment tool which reflects the proposed ward’s current level of decision making ability:

The proposed ward needs a limited guardian to provide assistance with decision making in the areas of financial, health care, residential and/or relationship matters; or

The proposed ward needs a full guardian to provide assistance with decision making in all areas;

The guardianship powers being requested;

The steps which have been taken to utilize less restrictive alternatives to guardianship; and,

The qualifications of the individual proposed to serve as limited guardian or guardian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1.

33-15-3.
Power of probate court to appoint limited guardians or guardians.

Pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the probate court in each city or town shall have the power to appoint or approve limited guardians or guardians of individuals who shall reside or have a legal settlement within the city or town, and of individuals who reside outside this state and have an estate within the city or town.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1041; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-3

; 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-4.
Limited guardianship.

Absent a finding, based on a decision making assessment tool, that an individual is totally incapacitated, the court shall limit the scope of the powers and duties of a guardian to the terms best suited to allow the individual found partially incapacitated to participate as fully as possible in decisions affecting him or her. One such decision making assessment tool must be completed by the respondent’s primary care physician, if one exists and is available, otherwise by a physician who has examined and treated the respondent. The probate court may consider such additional decision making assessments tools signed and submitted by one or more non-physicians or consulting physicians. The court shall not appoint a guardian or limited guardian if the court finds that the needs of the proposed ward are being met or can be met by a less restrictive alternative or alternatives. The court shall authorize the guardian to make decisions for the individual in only those areas where the court finds, based on one or more decision making assessment tools, that the individual lacks the capacity to make decisions. The court must strike a delicate balance between providing the protection and support necessary to assist the individual and preserving, to the largest degree possible, the liberty, property and privacy interests of the individual. The certificate of appointment issued to the limited guardian shall clearly state that it is a limited guardianship. The court order shall clearly indicate the scope of the powers and duties of the limited guardian. The appointment of a limited guardian shall not constitute a finding of legal incompetence. An individual for whom a limited guardian is appointed shall retain all legal and civil rights except those which have been specifically suspended by the order.

A decision-making assessment tool, in the form as shown in §

33-15-47

, must be filed with the petition in each case, provided, that the probate court may excuse the filing of a decision-making assessment tool only on a petition for temporary guardianship in extraordinary or emergency circumstances and upon the provision of other competent evidence.

The individual’s primary care physician must complete the decision-making assessment tool, however, if the individual’s primary care physician is not available or if the individual does not have a primary care physician the decision-making assessment tool must be completed by a physician who has examined and treated the individual. Professionals, or other persons acquainted with the individual being assessed, may also complete additional decision-making assessment tools.

Modification. If, because of a change in the partially incapacitated individual’s level of decision making ability, the scope and duties of the limited guardianship order no longer meet the needs of the individual and/or fail to afford the individual as much autonomy as possible, modification of the limited guardianship order is required.

Modification can be accomplished by agreement of: the partially incapacitated individual, his or her counsel, if any and the limited guardian. This agreement shall be submitted to the court and entered as an order.

Where no agreement can be reached, among these parties any or all of the parties may request a hearing.

However, provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to mean a person is in need of a guardian or limited guardian solely because he or she is being furnished or relies upon treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination recognized by the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1.

Parties to Appeal.

Petitioner who was owner of an annuity charged against the real estate of the intended ward was not entitled to appeal from a decree dismissing the petition as an aggrieved person, even though entitled to petition as a friend or relative. McKenna v. McKenna,

29 R.I. 224

, 69 A. 844,

1908 R.I. LEXIS 40

(1908).

33-15-4.1.
Good Samaritan guardians.

Any person who files a petition for a guardianship of the person pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may also file to be qualified as a good Samaritan guardian. A good Samaritan guardian may be appointed by the probate court in those instances where the court determines that the estate of a proposed ward is insufficient to pay for the services of a guardian and that such an appointment would otherwise be in the best interests of the individual for whom the guardianship is proposed.

A person filing for appointment of a good Samaritan guardianship shall file all the forms required by this chapter to initiate a guardianship petition and shall file an additional form setting forth the qualifications of the proposed guardian to serve as a good Samaritan guardian. Such forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The experience, if applicable, of the proposed guardian;

The willingness of the proposed guardian to serve as said good Samaritan guardian; and

A statement that if appointed as a good Samaritan guardian, such person shall not seek any fees and/or monetary compensation for their services as a good Samaritan; provided, that this shall not be construed to prohibit the good Samaritan guardian from soliciting and/or utilizing charitable donations for and on behalf of the individual under guardianship.

The appointment of a good Samaritan guardian shall be in the discretion of the probate court.

Except as otherwise provided for herein, hearings on and notice of the application for and appointment of a good Samaritan guardianship shall proceed in the same manner as any other petition for guardianship pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 299, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 419, § 3.

33-15-4.2.
Waiver of filing fees for good Samaritan guardianships.

The probate court may on exporting application, issue orders providing the payment of a filing fee in cases of a good Samaritan guardianship, prior to the filing of the petition. The probate court shall provide forms for such application for waiver of fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 494, § 1.

33-15-4.3.
No cash surety required.

Notwithstanding the provisions of R.I.G.L. §

33-17-1.3

, surety shall not be required on any bond of a good Samaritan guardian unless the probate court determines that the circumstances so warrant surety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 494, § 1.

33-15-4.4.
Immunity of good Samaritan guardians.

No person acting as a duly appointed good Samaritan guardian pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, will in the performance of their duty and responsibility as such a good Samaritan guardian, shall be liable for civil damage which result from acts or omissions by such persons so acting, which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 494, § 1.

33-15-4.5.
Continuing duties of good Samaritan guardians.

Except as otherwise provided for in §

33-15-4.1

—

33-15-4.4

, a good Samaritan guardian shall be subject to all other duties and responsibilities required of a guardian under this title, including but not limited to the provisions pertaining the accountings; provided, that the probate court may waive any and all filing requirements and court fees associated with the guardianship, if in its discretion such waiver is warranted. The probate court may modify, amend and/or revoke the good Samaritan guardianship upon the discovery or addition of assets to the individual’s estate and/or which otherwise make it inequitable for the guardian to continue to serve as a good Samaritan guardian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 494, § 1.

33-15-5.
Hearing.

No limited guardian or guardian shall be appointed until after a hearing on the petition. The hearing shall be before a judge of the probate court of the city or town where the petition was filed.

The respondent shall have the right to be present at the hearing and all other stages of the proceedings.

The respondent shall be allowed to:

Compel the attendance of witnesses;

Present evidence; and

Confront and cross examine witnesses.

The standard of proof shall be clear and convincing evidence.

The Rhode Island rules of evidence shall apply.

Any professional whose training and experience aid in the assessment of decision making ability and who has so assessed the respondent may be permitted to provide expert testimony regarding the decision making assessment of the respondent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1.

33-15-6.
Who may be appointed limited guardian or guardian.

The court shall not appoint as limited guardian or guardian any agency, public or private, or representative thereof, which financially benefits from providing housing, medical, or social services to the individual found to be incapacitated.

Before appointing an individual or agency as limited guardian or guardian, the court shall find that the individual or agency:

Has no criminal background which bears on suitability to serve as guardian;

Has the capacity to manage the financial resources involved;

Has the ability to meet the unique needs of the individual case; and

Has the ability to meet the requirements of the law.

Individuals or agencies eligible for consideration as limited guardian or guardian include, but are not limited to, the following:

Relatives or friends of the individual found to be incapacitated;

Banks, trust companies and other financial institutions;

Nonprofit corporations organized for charitable or religious purposes (including those organized specifically to act as limited guardian or guardian) and existing under the laws of this state.

The court may appoint an out of state resident as limited guardian or guardian if the court finds that the individual meets the requirements of this section.

In appointing a guardian, the court shall consider the wishes expressed by the individual found to be incapacitated as to preferences among individuals eligible to serve as limited guardian or guardian who meet the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4.

33-15-6.1.
National criminal background checks for persons appointed limited guardian or guardian.

In order to assist and protect Rhode Island’s at-risk elderly and others over whom a limited guardian or guardian would be required, all persons applying for appointment as a limited guardian or guardian shall apply to the Rhode Island attorney general, the Rhode Island state police, or to the appropriate local police department for a nationwide criminal records check, utilizing a standard form to be provided by the probate court. The applicant whose criminal records check is being conducted shall be responsible for the payment of the costs of the criminal records check. The check will conform to the applicable federal standards, including the taking of fingerprints of the applicant.

An individual may be appointed as a temporary limited guardian or temporary guardian for a period not to exceed ten (10) days, pending completion of the national criminal background check required by this section.

For the purposes of this section, information produced by a national criminal records check pertaining to conviction for the following crimes may be considered as “disqualifying information”: murder; voluntary manslaughter; involuntary manslaughter; first-degree sexual assault; second-degree sexual assault; third-degree sexual assault; assault on persons sixty (60) years of age or older; assault with intent to commit specified felonies (murder, robbery, rape, burglary, or the abominable and detestable crime against nature); felony assault; patient abuse; neglect or mistreatment of patients; burglary; first-degree arson; robbery; felony drug offenses; felony larceny or felony banking law violations; felony obtaining money under false pretenses; felony embezzlement; abuse, neglect, and/or exploitation of adults with severe impairments; exploitation of elders; or a crime under section 1128(a) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1320a-7(a)).

For the purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty or a plea of guilty, those instances where the defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received a sentence of probation and those instances where a defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement.

If any disqualifying information is discovered with respect to the applicant, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general, state police, or the local police department will inform the probate court, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying nature has been discovered. In addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general, state police, or the local police department will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. An applicant against whom disqualifying information has been found may request that a copy of the criminal background report be sent to the probate court which shall make the determination of suitability of the applicant.

At the conclusion of any background check required by this chapter, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general, state police, or the local police department will promptly destroy the fingerprint card of the applicant.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the attorney general, state police, or the local police department shall inform both the applicant and the probate court of this fact.

The probate court shall maintain a record subject to review by the department of attorney general of the evidence that criminal background checks have been initiated and completed and the results thereof, in compliance with the provisions of this section for all persons seeking appointment as a guardian or limited guardian after January 1, 2020.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 282, § 1.

33-15-7.
Guardians ad litem — Duties — Legally incapacitated respondent’s right to counsel — Termination of appointment of guardian ad litem.

Upon filing with the probate court clerk of a petition for the appointment of a guardian, a guardian ad litem shall be appointed for each respondent only in the proceeding for guardianship of an adult.

The guardian ad litem need not be an attorney but shall have sufficient experience and/or training in dealing with elderly persons and persons with incapacities and/or disabilities and understanding of his or her role as guardian ad litem to be able to properly discharge such duties under subsection (c) below. Each probate court shall maintain a list of persons deemed qualified to serve as a guardian ad litem and shall appoint from that list on a rotating basis. Any guardian ad litem appointed for a respondent shall be ineligible to serve as legal counsel, temporary guardian, or permanent guardian for that respondent.

The duties of a guardian ad litem shall include all of the following:

Personally visiting the respondent;

Explaining to the respondent the nature, purpose, and legal effect of the appointment of a guardian;

Explaining to the respondent the hearing procedure, including, but not limited to, the right to contest the petition, to request limits on the guardian’s powers, to object to a particular person being appointed guardian, to be present at the hearing, and to be represented by legal counsel;

Informing the respondent of the name of the person known to be seeking appointment as guardian;

Reviewing the decision making assessment tool(s), petition for guardianship/limited guardianship, and the notice;

Interviewing the prospective guardian by telephone or in person; and

Making determinations, and informing the court of those determinations, on all of the following:

Whether the respondent wishes to be present at the hearing;

Whether the respondent wishes to contest the petition;

Whether the respondent wishes limits placed on the guardian’s powers;

Whether the respondent objects to a particular person being appointed guardian; and

Whether the respondent wishes to be represented by legal counsel.

Unless waived by the court, at least three (3) days prior to the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file a report substantially in the form as set forth in §

33-15-47

with the court and shall mail or hand deliver a copy to each attorney of record.

If the respondent wishes to contest the petition, to have limits placed on the guardian’s powers, or to object to a particular person being appointed guardian, and, if legal counsel has not been secured, the court shall appoint legal counsel.

If the respondent requests legal counsel, or if the guardian ad litem determines it is in the best interest of the respondent to have legal counsel, and if legal counsel has not been secured, the court shall appoint legal counsel.

If the respondent has legal counsel independently or appointed pursuant to subsection (d) or (e), the appointment of a guardian ad litem shall terminate except insofar as informing the court of the respondent’s wishes and objections determined pursuant to subsection (c).

The guardian ad litem shall not interfere with interested parties and their counsel in gathering and presenting evidence according to court orders and rules of discovery and evidence. The guardian ad litem may be called and confronted as a witness regarding his or her conclusions as submitted by report and the extent of his or her personal knowledge concerning the respondent.

Court awarded guardian ad litem fees shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800), which shall be paid by the petitioner for guardianship if a permanent guardian is not appointed for the respondent or by the guardian of the ward’s estate if a permanent guardian is appointed. The court has discretion to award guardian ad litem fees in excess of the cap if the circumstances warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 299, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 294, § 1.

33-15-8.
Authority of limited guardian or guardian.

A limited guardian shall have only the authority as set forth by the limited guardianship order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 4.

33-15-8.1.
Temporary guardianship for specific purpose.

If it is established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists for the appointment of a limited guardian or guardian as described in §

35-15-5

, the court may appoint a temporary limited guardian for the specific purpose of authorizing, directing, or ratifying any transaction necessary or desirable for admission to a nursing facility, including, but not limited to, enrolling the protected person in the medicaid or general public assistance programs, in those instances where the nursing facility requires a limited guardian and the admission is in the best interest of the protected person. Prior to appointing a temporary limited guardian pursuant to this section, the court shall first make the following findings of fact:

That there exists a need for a limited guardian;

That no person is available to serve as full time guardian;

That no financial resources are available for the protected person’s use and care; and

That it is necessary for proper care and treatment, that the protected person be moved to a nursing facility. The court may accept the resignation of the temporary limited guardian after the protected person has been admitted to the nursing facility and has been enrolled in the medicaid or general public assistance programs, if applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-9.
Repealed.

33-15-10.
Appointment of temporary limited guardian or guardian.

The probate court for cause shown after notice, pending any application for the appointment of a limited guardian or guardian, or pending any appeal from a decree appointing a limited guardian or guardian, may, if it shall deem proper, appoint a temporary limited guardian or temporary guardian of the person and estate, or of the person or estate of the respondent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1048; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 8; P.L. 1952, ch. 2946, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-10

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-11.
Tenure of temporary limited guardian or guardian.

A temporary limited guardian or guardian shall serve until the question of appointment of a guardian is decided, or until he or she shall be discharged by the probate court. There shall be no appeal from the appointment of a temporary limited guardian or guardian.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1049; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-11

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-12.
Powers of temporary limited guardian or guardian — Bond.

Each limited guardian or guardian, appointed as provided in §

33-15-10

, shall have the authority granted by the temporary limited guardianship or guardianship order until he or she shall be legally discharged; and he or she shall give bond to the probate court in like manner, and with like conditions, as is required of limited guardians or guardians.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1050; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 10; P.L. 1952, ch. 2946, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-12

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-13.
Recording of petition in land records — Disability to contract.

Where the petition for appointment of a limited guardian or guardian alleges that the respondent lacks decision making ability regarding his or her real property, the petitioner shall cause a copy of the petition, with the order of notice thereon, to be recorded in the records of land evidence for the city or town in which any real property of the respondent is located. If a limited guardian or guardian is appointed with authority to administer the real property of the respondent, all contracts relative to, and sales and conveyances of, real property, made by the respondent after the record, and all other contracts, except for necessaries, and all gifts, sales, or transfers of personal property, made by the respondent after the first publication of notice of the petition and before the termination of the limited guardianship or guardianship, shall be void.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1051; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-13

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 223, § 1.

33-15-14.
Expense of prosecuting or defending against petition.

If a limited guardian or guardian is appointed for any individual under this chapter, the court shall make an allowance to be paid by the limited guardian or guardian, for all reasonable expenses incurred in prosecuting or defending against the petition.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1052; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-14

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-15.
Exemption of welfare agencies from costs and bond.

In any petition for the appointment of a limited guardian or guardian filed by the director of public welfare of any city or town or the directors of social and rehabilitative services and behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or their designated agent, in which the director or agent certifies that the petition is filed for the purpose of enabling the respondent, who is without funds, to receive assistance from funds which are financed in whole or in part by federal grants, the director or his or her agent, as petitioner, shall not be required to pay court fees or to give surety on his or her bond.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 426, § 43, as enacted by P.L. 1956, ch. 3757, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-15

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-16.
Guardian of estate of nonresident.

The probate court of any city or town may appoint or approve a limited guardian or guardian of the estate of an individual who resides outside this state and who has an estate in the city or town and has no limited guardian or guardian in this state and who, if a resident, would meet the standards for limited guardianship or guardianship under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1055; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-16

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3.

33-15-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1056; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-17

; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.

33-15-17.1.
Notice.

Except for the appointment of a temporary guardian, no petition for limited guardian or guardian shall be heard and no person shall be appointed limited guardian or guardian of an individual unless notice of the petition for appointment of a limited guardian or guardian and a copy of the petition itself shall be served upon the respondent in person at least fourteen (14) days prior to any hearing on the petition. If the hearing date is continued by the probate court for any reason after service on the respondent and no objection to the petition is filed by or on behalf of the respondent, no further service on the respondent shall be required. The probate court, in its discretion, may require further notice to the respondent in such manner as prescribed by the court.

In the case of a petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian, such fourteen (14) day notice period shall be reduced to five (5) days, unless a shorter period is ordered by the court.

This notice shall be in plain language, large type and shall include the time and place of the hearing, the possible loss of liberty if the petition is granted, and shall inform the respondent of his or her rights including: the court appointment of a guardian ad litem, the right to a hearing and to be present at the hearing to confront witnesses, present evidence, contest the petition, object to the appointment of a particular individual as guardian, request that limits be placed on the guardian’s powers, and the right to counsel. Notice shall be served upon the respondent by a process server duly authorized and licensed under Rhode Island law, except for “Good Samaritan” guardianships under §

33-15-4.1

in which case notice may be served upon the respondent by the guardian ad litem appointed by the court (hereinafter referred to as “court officer”).

The court officer that serves this notice shall be dressed in plain clothes. He or she shall have experience dealing with individuals who may lack decision making ability.

The court officer shall present the written notice and shall also read the notice to the respondent.

Except for a petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian, notice shall be given by the petitioner, or his or her attorney, at least ten (10) days before the date set for hearing on the petition by regular mail, postage prepaid, addressed to (1) the respondent’s spouse and heirs at law (under the rules of descent) as set forth in §

33-1-1

only at their last known addresses; and (2) the administrator of any care and treatment facility where the respondent resides or receives primary services; and (3) any individual or entity known or reasonably known to the petitioner to be regularly providing protective services to the respondent. In the case of a petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian, such ten (10) day notice period is reduced to five (5) days, unless a shorter period is ordered by the court, with the petitioner required to use reasonable efforts in identifying and noticing those individuals described in the immediately preceding sentence within the limitations of investigation of identity of addresses of such individuals inherent in a temporary guardianship proceeding. The petitioner or his or her attorney, shall at or prior to the hearing file or leave to be filed an affidavit that notice was given setting forth the names and post office addresses of the persons to whom the notice was sent and the date of mailing, together with a copy of the notice.

Should the petitioner have no knowledge of the existence or whereabouts of any of the persons required to be notified pursuant to subparagraph (e) above, an affidavit to that effect filed with the court shall satisfy this notice requirement.

Notwithstanding any notice requirement of the petitioner, and except for a petition for appointment of a temporary guardian the court shall give notice of the petition by advertisement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 299, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 419, § 3.

33-15-18.
Removal of limited guardian or guardian or conservator — Resignation.

Removal may be requested by the ward or anyone acting on behalf of the ward, including the limited guardian, guardian or conservator. The ward may retain counsel for this purpose.

The court shall remove any limited guardians, guardian or conservator appointed or approved by it upon finding that the limited guardian, guardian or conservator has not fulfilled, or is no longer able to fulfill, the duties of the appointment as set forth by the order itself and/or the limited guardianship and guardianship law.

The court shall remove any limited guardian or guardian or conservator upon finding that the ward, based on a decision making assessment tool, has the capacity to make decisions regarding his or her health care, finances, residence, and/or relationships.

A limited guardian or guardian or conservator may resign. The court shall accept the resignation of any limited guardian or guardian or conservator after he or she has accounted with the court for the estate of his or her ward in his or her possession and filed a report regarding the status of the ward including the ward’s current residence and condition.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1057; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 426, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-15-18

; P.L. 1992, ch. 493, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 1.